Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1319
Arbitration board; hearing; duration.

The arbitration board shall seek to complete its hearing on the issues submitted to it within forty-five days after the commencement of the hearing. The arbitration board may extend the time to complete the hearing beyond the forty-five-day period if the board determines that such extension is necessary.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 19.